Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5427.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1284c. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this act, a school district may provide virtual instruction under this section for not more than 15 days in a school year. Virtual instruction provided under this section must be counted as pupil instruction under section 101 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1701. If a school district plans to provide virtual instruction under this section, the school district's plan must be approved by the board of the school district, and the school district must provide notice of the plan to impacted pupils and the impacted pupils' parents or legal guardians before enactment of the plan. Days of virtual instruction under this section may only be used for the following purposes, as defined by the department: (a) Emergency closures. (b) Student testing days. (c) Professional development purposes, not to exceed a total of 30 hours during a school year. (2) As used in this section, "virtual instruction" means the provision of a virtual course as described in section 21f of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1621f. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05552'25) or House Bill No. 5428 (request no. H05552'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.